Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3256
Structural works;
supervision by licensed engineer; when.

All design
or construction by a district of structural works costing more than one hundred thousand dollars shall be under
the supervision of a licensed engineer except as otherwise provided in the
Engineers and Architects Regulation Act. The Board of Engineers and Architects
shall adjust the dollar amount in this section every fifth year. The first such adjustment after August
27, 2011, shall be effective on July 1, 2014. The adjusted amount
shall be equal to the then current amount adjusted by the cumulative percentage
change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the
Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for the five-year period preceding the
adjustment date. The amount shall be rounded to the next highest one-thousand-dollar
amount.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 56, p. 133;

Laws 1978, LB 420, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 56;

Laws 1999, LB 253, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 599, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 1.

Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.